District of Columbia statutes.
5-651

Definitions.

[Not funded].

History

Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 651
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-311, § 2, 60 DCR 3425

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-311 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Section 656 of D.C. Law 15-194, as added by D.C. Law 19-311, § 2, provided that this subchapter shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 656 of D.C. Law 15-194, as added by D.C. Law 19-311, § 2, provided that this section shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.